Massachusetts, session 194th, H508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Any student who participates in soccer contests, competitions or practices shall be
permitted to wear protective headgear on the field, provided that such headgear satisfies relevant
federal standards for headgear used in soccer.
of 1